src/morphology/affixes/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON a_22_ton_even !!= * @CODE@ muuttumaton
+A+Sg       :%>t^O          nom_n          ; ! used2be without > before n
+A+Sg       :%>tt^Om^A      gen_n_sg       ;
+A+Sg       :%>t^On         par_tA         ;
+A+Sg       :%>tt^Om        ill_hAAn       ; ! used2be +Ill:%>tt^Omh^A^A n_PxK
+A+Sg       :%>tt^Om^A      ess_nA         ;
+A+Sg       :%>tt^Om^A      sgpl_cases_odd ;

+A+Pl       :%>tt^Om^A      nom_t          ;
!+A+Pl+Dial/Por:%>tt^Om%>i2    gen_Vn         ; ! really Vn?
+A+Pl       :%>tt^Om        gen_mii/mitten_miin ;
+A+Pl       :%>tt^Om        par_ii_group   ;
+A+Pl       :%>tt^Om        ill_hiin       ; ! +Ill:%>tt^Omh%>i2in K
+A+Pl       :%>tt^Om%>i2    ess_nnA        ;
+A+Pl       :%>tt^Om%>i2    com_nne        ;
+A+Pl       :%>tt^Om%>i2    sgpl_cases_odd ;

+A:%>tt^Om^A comp_mm ;
+A:%>tt^Omi5i superl_m_even ;
+A+Dial/Var :%>tt^Omi5  superl_m_even ;


!+A+Pl+Dial/Por:%>tt^Om%>i2%>i gen_tten       ; ! muuttumattomiitten
!+A+Pl+Dial/Jok:%>tt^Om%>i2    gen_tten       ; ! muuttumattomiitten
!+A+Pl+Dial/Por:%>tt^Omi%>i2   par_end        ; ! muuttumattomii
!+A+Pl+Dial/Por:%>tt^Omi%>i2   par_tA         ; ! muuttumattomiita
!+A+Pl+Dial/Jok:%>tt^Om%>i2    par_A         ; ! muuttumattomia
!+A:%>tt^Omh%>i2 shorterillpl ;
!+Pl:%>tt^Om%>i2%>i a_shortestgenpl ; ! onnettomiin
! +Pl+Gen:tt^Omm%>i2in K ;
!+A+Pl+Compar+Gen:m^A%>mpp%>i2%>in K ; ! muuttumamamppiin
!+A+Pl+Superl+Gen:mi%>mpp%>i2%>in K ; ! muuttumamimppiin
! +Sg+Ill:tt^Omh^A^An K ;
!+A:%>tt^Om^A sgpl_cases_common ; ! NO SG OR PL !?!?!?!?!?!?!? wtf


LEXICON a_22_ton_odd !!= * @CODE@ onneton
+A: x_22_ton ;
+A:%>tt^Om^A comp_onneton ;
+A:%>tt^Ommi5i superl_onneton ;
+A+Dial/Var :%>tt^Ommi5 superl_onneton ;


LEXICON MATONodd !!= @CODE@ ! käymättömäle le la na ! TODO Probably not in use atm
+A: x_22_ton ;

LEXICON x_22_ton !!= * @CODE@ onneton
  +Sg       :%>t^O          nom_n             ;
  +Sg       :%>tt^Om^A      gen_n_sg          ;
  +Sg       :%>t^On         par_tA            ;
  +Sg       :%>tt^Om        ill_hAAn          ; ! used2be +Ill:%>tt^Omh^A^A
  +Sg       :%>tt^Om^A      ess_nA            ;
  +Sg       :%>tt^Om^A      sgpl_cases_even   ;

  +Pl       :%>tt^Om^A      nom_t             ;
  +Pl       :%>tt^Om        gen_mii/mitten_miin ;
  +Pl       :%>tt^Om        par_ii_group      ;
  +Pl       :%>tt^Om        ill_hiin          ; ! +Ill:%>tt^Omh%>i2in K
  +Pl       :%>tt^Om%>i2    ess_nA            ;
  +Pl       :%>tt^Om%>i2    com_ne            ;
  +Pl       :%>tt^Om%>i2    sgpl_cases_even   ;
  
  
LEXICON a_22_ton_yksi_t
+A: x_22_ton_yksi_t   ; 
+A:%>t^Om^A comp_onneton ;
+A:%>t^Ommi5i superl_onneton ;
+A+Dial/Var :%>t^Ommi5 superl_onneton ;

LEXICON x_22_ton_yksi_t !!= * @CODE@ alaston yhelä -t:läm alastoman
  +Sg       :%>t^O          nom_n             ;
  +Sg       :%>t^Om^A      gen_n_sg          ;
  +Sg       :%>t^On         par_tA            ;
  +Sg       :%>t^Om        ill_hAAn          ; ! used2be +Ill:%>tt^Omh^A^A
  +Sg       :%>t^Om^A      ess_nA            ;
  +Sg       :%>t^Om^A      sgpl_cases_even   ;

  +Pl       :%>t^Om^A      nom_t             ;
  +Pl       :%>t^Om        gen_mii/mitten_miin ;
  +Pl       :%>t^Om        par_ii_group      ;
  +Pl       :%>t^Om        ill_hiin          ; ! +Ill:%>tt^Omh%>i2in K
  +Pl       :%>t^Om%>i2    ess_nA            ;
  +Pl       :%>t^Om%>i2    com_ne            ;
  +Pl       :%>t^Om%>i2    sgpl_cases_even   ;



!+Pl:%>i2 gen_Vn     ;
! +Sg+Ill:tt^Omh^A^An K ;
! +Pl+Gen:tt^Omm%>i2in K ;


!! !!!Basic paradigms
!  ===================

!! Most cases are directed to affixes/nouns.lexc

!LEXICON a_sgpl_cases_common  != * @CODE@
! +Abl:%>lt^A PxxK ;
! +Ine:%>ss^A PxxK ;
! +Ela:%>st^A PxxK ;
! +Tra:%>ksi K ;
! +Tra:%>kse Pxx ;
! +Abe:%>tt^A PxxK ;


!! !!Lexica for the non-uniform cases
!    ---------------------------------


!LEXICON shortest-illativ_sg  !jos h ei siirry
! +Sg+Ill:%>^V n_PxK ;

!LEXICON a_shortestgenpl !! * @CODE@ zero, because ii > i
! +Gen: n_PxK ;


!LEXICON a_shorterillpl
! +Ill:%>i2 n_PxK ;


LEXICON comp_m_odd  ! odd here meaning the resulting stem: 2syll + comp = 3syll
  +Sg+Compar:%>mp^A    ess_nnA         ;
  +Sg+Compar:%>m^A     sgpl_cases_odd  ;  ! ade, all, ine, ela, abl, tra

  +Pl+Compar:%>mp%>i2  ess_nnA         ;
  +Pl+Compar:%>mp%>i2  com_nne         ;
  +Pl+Compar:%>m%>i2   sgpl_cases_odd  ;
                   comp_m_common   ;

LEXICON comp_m_even  ! split for syllabicity sinnikkhäämälä
  +Sg+Compar:%>mp^A    ess_nA          ;
  +Sg+Compar:%>m^A     sgpl_cases_even ;  ! ade, all, ine, ela, abl, tra

  +Pl+Compar:%>mp%>i2  ess_nA          ;
  +Pl+Compar:%>mp%>i2  com_ne          ;
  +Pl+Compar:%>m%>i2   sgpl_cases_even ;
                   comp_m_common   ;

LEXICON comp_m_common
  +Sg+Compar:          nom_mpi        ;
  +Sg+Compar:%>m^A     gen_n          ;
  +Sg+Compar:%>mp      par_pA/A_group ; ! used2be included in LIGä twolc
  +Sg+Compar:%>mp      ill_hAAn       ;

  +Pl+Compar:%>m^A     nom_t          ;
  +Pl+Compar:%>m       gen_mii/mitten ;
  +Pl+Compar:%>m       par_ppii_group ;
  +Pl+Compar:%>mp      ill_hiin       ; ! used2be +Ill:%>mp%>hi%>i2n K

!+A+Compar:%>m^A weak_v_stem ;
!+A+Pl+Compar+Dial/Por:%>m%>i2i  gen_tten ; ! liberaalimitten ! used2be +Gen:%>m%>i2%>itten K ;
!+A+Pl+Compar+Dial/Jok:%>m%>i2  gen_tten ; ! liberaalimiitten i2 or i ?
!+A+Pl+Compar+Dial/Por:%>mpp%>i2%>i par_tA   ; ! used2be +Par:%>mpp%>i2%>it^A K ;
!+A+Pl+Compar+Dial/Por:%>mpp%>i2%>i par_end  ; ! used2be +Par:%>mpp%>i2%>i K  ;
!+A+Pl+Compar+Dial/-Por:%>mp%>i2 par_A  ; ! sinnikkhäämpiä, liberaalimpia

LEXICON comp_onneton
  +Sg+Compar:          nom_mpi         ;
  +Sg+Compar:%>m^A     gen_n           ;
  +Sg+Compar:%>mp      par_pA/A_group  ; ! used2be included in LIGä twolc
  +Sg+Compar:%>mp      ill_hAAn        ;
  +Sg+Compar:%>mp^A    ess_nnA         ;
  +Sg+Compar:%>m^A     sgpl_cases_odd  ;

  +Pl+Compar:%>m^A     nom_t           ;
  +Pl+Compar:%>m       gen_mii/mitten  ;
  +Pl+Compar:%>m       par_ppii_group  ;
  +Pl+Compar:%>mp      ill_hiin        ; ! used2be +Gen:se%>mm%>ii2tten K
  +Pl+Compar:%>mp%>i2  ess_nnA         ;
  +Pl+Compar:%>mp%>i2  com_nne         ; ! onnettomampinne
! +Pl+Compar+Dial/Jok:%>mp%>i2 com_ne         ;
  +Pl+Compar:%>m%>i2   sgpl_cases_odd  ;
!+Pl+Compar+Gen:%>mpp%>i2%>in K ;
!+Compar:%>m^A weak_v_stem ;

LEXICON comp_mm

  +Sg+Compar:          nom_mpi         ;
  +Sg+Compar:%>mm^A    gen_n           ;
  +Sg+Compar:%>mp      par_pA/A_group  ; ! used2be included in LIGä twolc
  +Sg+Compar:%>mp      ill_hAAn        ;
  +Sg+Compar:%>mp^A    ess_nA          ; ! +Ess:%>mp^A%>n^A K
  +Sg+Compar:%>mm^A    sgpl_cases_even ;

  +Pl+Compar:%>mm^A    nom_t           ; ! +Nom:%>mm^A%>t K ;
  +Pl+Compar:m         gen_mmii/mmitten ;
  +Pl+Compar:%>m       par_ppii_group  ; ! för uten suffiksgrense
  +Pl+Compar:%>mp      ill_hiin        ; ! +Ill:%>mp%>hi%>i2n K
  +Pl+Compar:%>mp%>i2  ess_nA          ;
  +Pl+Compar:%>mp%>i2  com_ne          ;
  +Pl+Compar:%>mm%>i2  sgpl_cases_even ;

!+A+Compar:%>m^A weak_v_stem ;
!+A+Pl+Compar+Gen:%>mpp%>i2in K ;
!+Pl+Compar+Dial/Por:%>mm%>ii2 gen_tten ; ! used2be +Gen:%>mm%>ii2tten K ;


LEXICON superl_m_even
  +Sg+Superl:%>mp^A   ess_nA          ; !+Ess:%>mp^A%>n^A    K ;
  +Sg+Superl:%>m^A    sgpl_cases_even ;

  +Pl+Superl:%>mp%>i2 ess_nA          ; !+Ess:%>mp%>i2%>n^A    K ;
  +Pl+Superl:%>mp%>i2 com_ne          ;
  +Pl+Superl:%>m%>i2  sgpl_cases_even ;
  : superl_m_common ;

LEXICON superl_m_odd
  +Sg+Superl:%>mp^A   ess_nnA        ;
  +Sg+Superl:%>m^A    sgpl_cases_odd ;

  +Pl+Superl:%>mp%>i2 ess_nnA        ;
  +Pl+Superl:%>mp%>i2 com_nne        ;
  +Pl+Superl:%>m%>i2  sgpl_cases_odd ;
  : superl_m_common ;
