src/morphology/stems/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON AdjectiveRoot
onneton:onne a_22_ton_odd ; ! TODO Double check the 2.2 chapter number in Eira's Grammar
muuttumaton:muuttuma a_22_ton_even ; ! TODO Double check the 2.2 chapter number in Eira's Grammar
jumalaton:jumala a_22_ton_even ;
vallaton:valla a_22_ton_even ;
mittaamaton:mittaama a_22_ton_even ;
maksamaton:maksama a_22_ton_even ;
perhäänantamaton:perhäänantama a_22_ton_even ;
paistamaton:paistama a_22_ton_even ;
luottamaton:luottama a_22_ton_even ;
vaihettelematon:vaihettelema a_22_ton_even ;
valettelematon:valettelema a_22_ton_even ;
olematon:olema a_22_ton_even ;
tuntematon:tuntema a_22_ton_even ;
huolimaton:huolima a_22_ton_even ;
oppimaton:oppima a_22_ton_even ;
vaatimaton:vaatima a_22_ton_even ;
uskomaton:uskoma a_22_ton_even ;
liikkumaton:liikkuma a_22_ton_even ;
loppumaton:loppuma a_22_ton_even ;
kärsimätön:kärsimä a_22_ton_even ;
näkymätön:näkymä a_22_ton_even ;
tietämätön:tietämä a_22_ton_even ;
välttämätön:välttämä a_22_ton_even ;
taipumaton:taipuma a_22_ton_even ;
rauhaton:rauha a_22_ton_odd ;
viaton:via a_22_ton_odd ;
rajaton:raja a_22_ton_odd ;
pohjaton:pohja a_22_ton_odd ;
vijaton:vija a_22_ton_odd ;
saamaton:saama a_22_ton_odd ;
tottelematon:tottelema a_22_ton_odd ;
naimaton:naima a_22_ton_odd ;
herraton:herra a_22_ton_odd ;
luvaton:luva a_22_ton_odd ;
hengetön:henge a_22_ton_odd ;
toimeton:toime a_22_ton_odd ;
äänetön:ääne a_22_ton_odd ;
pilvetön:pilve a_22_ton_odd ;
färitön:färi a_22_ton_odd ;
hävitön:hävi a_22_ton_odd ;
ruokoton:ruoko a_22_ton_odd ;
uskoton:usko a_22_ton_odd ;
armoton:armo a_22_ton_odd ;
painoton:paino a_22_ton_odd ;
levoton:levo a_22_ton_odd ;
kelvoton:kelvo a_22_ton_odd ;
arvoton:arvo a_22_ton_odd ;
mahđoton:mahđo a_22_ton_odd ;
alaston:alas a_22_ton_yksi_t;
loputon:lopu a_22_ton_odd ;
suruton:suru a_22_ton_odd ;
avuton:avu a_22_ton_odd ;
mavuton:mavu a_22_ton_odd ;
hävytön:hävy a_22_ton_odd ;
kykenemätön:kykenemä a_22_ton_odd ;
ymmärtämätön:ymmärtämä a_22_ton_odd ;
määrätön:määrä a_22_ton_odd ;
mitätön:mitä a_22_ton_odd ;
ajattelematon:ajattelema a_22_ton_even ;
